Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB360.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 51SOLITARY CONFINEMENTSec.5101. Definitions.5102. Data collection and reporting requirements.§ 5101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Inmate." Notwithstanding the definition of "inmate" under section 102 (relating to definitions), an adult person committed to a term of imprisonment or otherwise confined in a State 123456789101112131415161718 correctional institution."Member of a vulnerable population." Any of the following:(1) An inmate who is 21 years of age or younger.(2) An inmate who is 70 years of age or older.(3) An inmate who is pregnant or in the postpartum period.(4) An inmate who has recently suffered a miscarriage or terminated a pregnancy.(5) An inmate who is perceived to be lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender or intersex."Personally identifiable information." Any representation of information that permits the identity of an individual to whom the information applies to be reasonably inferred by either direct or indirect means, including the individual's:(1) name;(2) address;(3) Social Security number or other identifying number or code;(4) telephone number; or(5) email address."Postpartum period." The period following delivery before an inmate or a detainee has been discharged from a medical facility."Solitary confinement." The confinement of an inmate in a State correctional institution due to disciplinary, administrative, protective, investigative, medical or other classification, in a cell or similarly confined holding or living space, alone or with other inmates for approximately 20 hours or more per day, with severely restricted activity, movement and social interaction.20250SB0360PN0306 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "State correctional institution." A correctional institution or facility housing incarcerated individuals owned or operated by the Commonwealth.§ 5102. Data collection and reporting requirements.(a) Data collection.--The department shall collect the following information as required for reporting under subsection (b):(1) The average annual State prison population.(2) The number of inmates housed within solitary confinement and the number of inmates released from solitary confinement.(3) For each inmate housed within solitary confinement, the age, sex, race, ethnicity, mental health code, medical class code, security level and custody level classification of the inmate and whether the inmate is a member of a vulnerable population.(4) For each inmate released from solitary confinement, any change to the inmate's mental health code, medical class code, security level or custody level classification.(5) The reason or reasons for which each inmate was placed into solitary confinement.(6) The number of days each inmate was housed within solitary confinement per confinement.(7) The number of incidents of self-harm, offenses toward others, suicide attempts and suicides for inmates housed within solitary confinement.(8) The number of incidents of self-harm, offenses toward others, suicide attempts and suicides for inmates released from solitary confinement.(9) The current three-year recidivism rate for all 20250SB0360PN0306 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 inmates released from the State prison system and the three-year recidivism rate for inmates released from the State prison system who were housed in solitary confinement at any time in the two years preceding their release.(10) The number of staff persons, including a breakdown by job classification, dedicated to inmates housed within solitary confinement during the previous calendar year.(b) Annual report.--(1) On August 1 of the year that begins immediately following the effective date of this paragraph, and each August 1 thereafter, the department shall issue a report that includes:(i) In the aggregate, the data collected under subsection (a) for the previous calendar year.(ii) A description of any changes made during the previous calendar year to written policies or procedures of the department relating to the use and conditions of solitary confinement.(2) The department shall ensure that each report under this subsection does not contain any personally identifiable information of any inmate as a result of the required data collection.(3) The department shall submit each report under this subsection to:(i) The Governor.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Publication requirements.--20250SB0360PN0306 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Within 30 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall:(i) Provide a copy of the department's policies and procedures governing the use of solitary confinement to:(A) The Governor.(B) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate.(C) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives.(ii) Post the department's policies and procedures governing the use of solitary confinement on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) If the department changes a policy or procedure governing the use of solitary confinement following dissemination of policies and procedures under paragraph (1), the department shall update the policies and procedures posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and provide written notice to recipients listed in paragraph (1)(i). A policy or procedure updated under this paragraph must include an annotation with dates to indicate any changes that have been made.(3) Within 10 days of the submittal of a report under subsection (b), the department shall post the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0360PN0306 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526